Georgia, session 2025_26, HB208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 3 of Chapter 2 of Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
prestige license plates and special plates for certain persons and vehicles, is amended by
- 1 -

LC 39 4766S
revising Code Section 40-2-69, relating to license plates for veterans qualifying as totally
disabled, as follows:
"40-2-69.
(a) Any disabled veteran who is a citizen and resident of this state shall, upon application
therefor, be issued a free motor vehicle license plate. As used in this Code section, the
term 'disabled veteran' shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in 'totally
disabled veteran' means an individual who qualifies as a disabled veteran pursuant to
paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 48-5-48.
(b) Any totally disabled veteran shall, upon proper application therefor, be issued a free
motor vehicle license plate plates for up to two motorcycles or passenger cars for personal
use registered pursuant to this chapter in his or her name upon presentation of proof that
he or she qualifies as a totally disabled veteran. A totally disabled veteran who claims that
his or her disability is permanent applying for license plates pursuant to this Code section
shall furnish proof of such permanent disability through a letter from the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs.
(c)(1) Once a totally disabled veteran has established his or her eligibility to receive free
motor vehicle license plates as a result of being permanently disabled pursuant to this
Code section, he or she shall be entitled to receive free license plates or free revalidation
decals in succeeding years on any automobile, private passenger pickup truck,
motorcycle, station wagon, or van type vehicle of three-quarter tons or less for up to two
motorcycles or passenger cars for personal use registered pursuant to this chapter that he
or she may own or jointly with his or her spouse or minor child own or acquire in the
future.
(2) Once a disabled veteran has established his or her eligibility to receive free motor
vehicle license plates but his or her disability has not been determined to be a permanent
disability, he or she shall be entitled to receive free plates or free revalidation decals in
succeeding years upon furnishing, on an annual basis, proof of his or her status as a
- 2 -

LC 39 4766S
disabled veteran through a letter from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.
Such free plates or free revalidation decals shall apply to any automobile, private
passenger pickup truck, motorcycle, station wagon, or van type vehicle of three-quarter
tons or less that he or she may own or jointly with his or her spouse or minor child own
or acquire in the future.
(3)(2)(A) Up to two Two license plates or revalidation decals each year shall be
furnished for motor vehicles other than motorcycles to totally disabled veterans
qualifying under this Code section unless the originals are lost. Such plates license
plate shall be fastened to both the front and the rear of the motor vehicle.
(B) Up to two license plates or revalidation decals One license plate or revalidation
decal each year shall be furnished for motorcycles to totally disabled veterans
qualifying under this Code section unless the original is lost. Such license plate shall
be fastened to the rear of the motor vehicle.
(4)(3) In the event of the death of the person who received the special license plates
pursuant to this Code section, upon complying with the motor vehicle laws relating to
registration and licensing of motor vehicles, his or her unremarried surviving spouse or
minor child may continue to receive the free special license plates authorized by this
Code section and revalidation decals until the remarriage of the surviving spouse or death
of the surviving spouse or minor child."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended by revising Code Section 40-2-70, relating to license plates
for veterans not qualifying as totally disabled, as follows:
"40-2-70.
(a) Any citizen and resident of the State of Georgia this state who has been discharged
from the armed forces under conditions other than dishonorable or who is currently serving
in the armed forces, who is disabled to any degree specified and enumerated in Code
- 3 -

LC 39 4766S
Section 40-2-69, and who is the owner of a private passenger motor vehicle, but who
cannot qualify under but does not qualify as totally disabled pursuant to paragraph (1) of
subsection (a) of Code Section 48-5-48 for purposes of qualification for a license plate
issued pursuant to Code Section 40-2-69, shall be entitled to a special and distinctive
automobile license plate license plates for up to two motorcycles or passenger cars for
personal use registered pursuant to this chapter in his or her name. Such license plate
plates shall be transferred to another vehicle acquired by such veteran or jointly by such
veteran and his or her spouse as provided in Code Section 40-2-80. Such veteran shall be
entitled to such plate license plates issued pursuant to this Code section regardless of
whether he or she is suffering from a service connected or nonservice connected disability.
(b) Upon proper application and Such veteran must apply for such license plate and, upon
compliance with the state motor vehicle laws for licensing of motor vehicles and without
payment of the regular license fee for plates as prescribed under Article 7 of this chapter,
such veteran a disabled veteran who does not qualify for license plates pursuant to Code
Section 40-2-69 shall be issued similar license plates as prescribed in Code Section 40-2-71
for private passenger cars up to two motorcycles or passenger cars for personal use. There
shall be no charge for the additional plate issued such veteran under this Code section.
There shall be no charge for revalidation decals for such plates license plates issued
pursuant to this Code section.
(c) For purposes of applying for license plates issued pursuant to this Code section, If a
veteran who has not been certified as disabled by the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs, such veteran may submit to the Department of Veterans Service such veteran's
discharge papers and a certified statement from a physician, licensed under Chapter 34 of
Title 43, certifying that, in the opinion of such physician, such veteran is disabled to a
degree enumerated in Code Section 40-2-69. If the certificate from the physician indicates
the qualifying disabilities which meet the standards of the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs, the commissioner of veterans service shall submit a letter to the state
- 4 -

LC 39 4766S
revenue commissioner indicating that the veteran meets the requirements of this Code
section and qualifies for a special license plate plates as provided in this Code section.
(d) Once a disabled veteran has established his or her eligibility to receive free motor
100 vehicle license plates pursuant to this Code section but his or her disability has not been
101 determined to be a permanent disability, he or she shall be entitled to receive free license
102 plates or free revalidation decals in succeeding years upon furnishing, on an annual basis,
103 proof of his or her status as a disabled veteran through a letter from the United States
104 Department of Veterans Affairs. Such free license plates or free revalidation decals shall
105 be for up to two motorcycles or passenger cars for personal use registered pursuant to this
106 chapter that he or she may own or jointly with his or her spouse or minor child own or
107 acquire in the future."
108 SECTION 3.
109 Said article is further amended by revising Code Section 40-2-71, relating to design of
110 disabled veteran license plates and restrictions on issuance and transfer, as follows:
111 "40-2-71.
112 (a) The commissioner is directed to furnish the license plates provided for in Code
113 Sections 40-2-69 and 40-2-70. Such plates shall be printed in three colors: red, white, and
114 blue. The commissioner is authorized and directed to design the license plate. Each
115 license plate shall contain, in bold characters, the name of the state, or abbreviation thereof,
116 the year, the serial number, either the words 'Disabled Veteran' or 'Disabled Vet,' and an
117 image of the International Symbol of Access which is at least one inch in height and is
118 white on a blue background.
119 (b) Such license plates so issued shall be transferred to another vehicle as provided in
120 Code Section 40-2-80.
- 5 -

LC 39 4766S
121 (c) No disabled veteran shall be entitled to own or operate more than one vehicle two
122 vehicles with the free license plates provided by Code Sections 40-2-69, 40-2-70, and this
123 Code section."
124 SECTION 4.
125 Said article is further amended in Code Section 40-2-86, relating to special license plates
126 promoting or supporting certain worthy agencies, funds, or nonprofit corporations with
127 proceeds disbursed to the general fund and the agency, fund, or nonprofit corporation, by
128 adding a new paragraph to subsection (l) to read as follows:
129 "(71) A special license plate honoring the Shepherd Center. The funds raised by the sale
130 of this special license plate shall be disbursed to Shepherd Center, Inc."
131 SECTION 5.
132 Said article is further amended in said Code section by adding new paragraphs to subsections
133 (l), (m), and (n) to read as follows:
134 "(72) A special license plate honoring Georgia veterans and their families. The funds
135 raised by the sale of this special license plate shall be disbursed to the Georgia Veterans
136 Service Foundation.
137 (73) A special license plate honoring Southern University Alumni. The funds raised by
138 the sale of this special license plate shall be disbursed to the Atlanta Metropolitan Chapter
139 of Southern University Alumni Federation of Georgia, Inc.
140 (74) A special license plate honoring Delta Sigma Theta Sorority, Inc. The funds raised
141 by the sale of this special license plate shall be disbursed to the Delta Life Development
142 Center."
143 "(18) A special license plate to support the state parks and historic sites division of the
144 Department of Natural Resources in its protection, management, and maintenance of this
145 state's natural, historical, and cultural resources while providing opportunities for public
- 6 -

LC 39 4766S
146 enjoyment and education. The funds raised by the sale of this special license plate shall
147 be disbursed to the Department of Natural Resources for use by the state parks and
148 historic sites division for the purposes provided for in this paragraph. Such license plate
149 shall not include a space for a county name decal but shall instead bear the legend
150 'Georgia State Parks' in lieu of the name of the county of issuance."
151 "(10) A special license plate promoting conservation and enhancement of black bass
152 populations. The funds raised by the sale of this special license plate shall be disbursed
153 to the Georgia Natural Resources Foundation to supplement black bass research,
154 restoration, habitat improvement, stocking, and other management programs."
155 SECTION 6.
156 In accordance with the requirements of Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(n) of the
157 Constitution of the State of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the
158 requisite two-thirds' majority vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
159 SECTION 7.
160 (a) Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (b) of this section, this Act shall become
161 effective on July 1, 2025.
162 (b) Sections 1, 2, 3, and 5 of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
163 SECTION 8.
164 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 7 -